test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-dejot_gt-norm.yaml
#     dejot+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: raciens
#     dejot+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: raciena
#     dejot+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: racienam
#     dejot+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Acc: racienu
#     dejot+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: racienā
#     dejot+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Voc: [raciens, racien]
#     dejot+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: racieni
#     dejot+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: racienu
#     dejot+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: racieniem
#     dejot+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Acc: racienus
#     dejot+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: racienos
#     dejot+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Voc: racieni

     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2: dejojot
     dejot+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Pred2: dejojam
     dejot+V+TV+Cond: dejotu
     dejot+V+TV+Deb+Quo: jādejojot
